Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.228

Gambling activities by persons under age eighteen prohibited—Penalties—Jurisdiction—In-house controlled purchase programs authorized.

(1) It is unlawful for any person under the age of eighteen to play in authorized gambling activities including, but not limited to, punchboards, pull-tabs, or card games, or to participate in fund-raising events. Persons under the age of eighteen may play bingo, raffles, and amusement game activities only as provided in commission rules.

(2) A person under the age of eighteen who violates subsection (1) of this section by engaging in, or attempting to engage in, prohibited gambling activities commits a class 2 civil infraction under chapter 7.80 RCW and is subject to a fine set out in chapter 7.80 RCW, up to four hours of community restitution, and any court imposed costs.

(3) The juvenile court divisions in superior courts within the state have jurisdiction for enforcement of this section.

(4)(a) An employer may conduct an in-house controlled purchase program authorized for the purposes of employee training and employer self-compliance checks.

(b) The civil infraction provisions of this section do not apply to a person under the age of eighteen who is participating in an in-house controlled purchase program authorized by the commission under rules adopted by the commission. Violations occurring under an in-house controlled purchase program authorized by the commission may not be used for criminal or administrative prosecution.

(c) An employer who conducts an in-house controlled purchase program authorized under this section shall provide his or her employees a written description of the employer's in-house controlled purchase program. The written description must include notice of actions an employer may take as a consequence of an employee's failure to comply with company policies regarding unauthorized persons engaging in gambling activities during a controlled purchase program authorized under this section.

(5) A person under the age of eighteen who violates subsection (1) of this section shall not collect any winnings or recover any losses arising as a result of unlawfully participating in any gambling activity. Additionally, any money or anything of value which has been obtained by, or is owed to, any person under the age of eighteen as a result of such participation shall be forfeited to the department of social and health services division of alcohol and substance abuse or its successor and used for a program related to youth problem gambling awareness, prevention, and/or education. Any person claiming any money or things of value subject to forfeiture under this subsection will receive notice and an opportunity for a hearing under RCW 9.46.231.

[ 2009 c 357 s 2.]